Washington statutes.
RCW 15.36.171

Grades of milk and milk products that may be sold.

The director may revoke the license of any milk processing plant or producer whose product fails to qualify as grade A pasteurized or grade A raw, or in lieu thereof may degrade the product to grade C and permit its sale as other than fluid milk or grade A milk products during a period not exceeding thirty days. In the event of an emergency, the director may permit the sale of grade C milk for more than thirty days.

[ 1999 c 291 s 9; 1995 c 374 s 3; 1994 c 143 s 301; 1989 c 354 s 22; 1961 c 11 s 15.36.470. Prior: 1949 c 168 s 8; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 6266-37. Formerly RCW 15.36.470.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1995 c 374 ss 1-47, 50-53, and 59-68: See note following RCW 15.36.012.

Severability—1989 c 354: See note following RCW 15.36.012.